tables/de-g2-core.cti
# ES  (4.1 Lautgruppenkürzungen)
always es 123456
midword esammel 15-234-1-1346-13456
midword esamml 15-234-1-1346-123
always esch 15-156
midendword eschrift 15-156-2345
midendword eshire 15-234-125-24-1235-15
midendword eshires 15-234-125-24-1235-123456
midendword eshow 15-234-125-135-2456
always ess 15-2346
always essch 123456-156
endword esschen 15-2346-1456-14
endword esschens 15-2346-1456-14-234
always est 15-23456
midendword estell 15-2-13456
midendword estund 15-23456-256-145
prfword caesar 6-14-1-15-234-1-1235
begmidword caesar 6-14-1-15-234-356
before s always sterbe 23456-12456-23
before s always service 234-12456-1236-24-6-14-15
prfword services 234-12456-1236-24-6-14-123456
before s always patience 1234-1-2345-24-14-6-14-15
before s always renaissance 1235-14-1-24-2346-235-6-14-15
begmidword desensibilis 145-15-234-14-234-24-12-24-123-24-234
begmidword despektier 145-15-234-1234-15-13-2345-346-1235
before s always bade 12-1-145-15
prfword bades 12-1-145-123456
prfword bades 12-1-145-123456
prfword badest 12-1-145-15-23456
always badestell 12-1-145-15-2-13456
begmidword badest 12-1-145-15-23456
before s begmidword jade 245-1-145-15
prfword jades 245-1-145-123456
before s always lade 123-1-145-15
prfword blades 12-123-1-145-123456
prfword glades 1245-123-1-145-123456
before s always gerade 12346-1235-1-145-15
always geradeswegs 12346-1235-1-145-123456-2456-1245-234
prfword gerades 12346-1235-1-145-123456
before s always parade 1234-356-1-145-15
before s always schmiede 156-134-346-145-15
prfword schmiedes 156-134-346-145-123456
before s always rede 1235-15-145-15
prfword redes 1235-15-145-123456
before s always getreide 12346-2345-1235-146-145-15
prfword getreides 12346-2345-1235-146-145-123456
before s always eingeweide 1246-12346-2456-146-145-15
before s always gemälde 12346-134-345-123-145-15
prfword gemäldes 12346-134-345-123-145-123456
before s always melde 134-13456-145-15
before s begmidword gelände 12346-123-345-1345-145-15
prfword geländes 12346-123-345-1345-145-123456
before s always stände 5-23456-15
before s always gemeinde 12346-134-1246-145-15
before s always gewinde 12346-2456-35-145-15
prfword gewindes 12346-2456-35-145-123456
before s always hunde 125-256-145-15
prfword hundes 125-256-145-123456
before s always sende 234-14-145-15
prfword sendes 234-14-145-123456
always börsendesaster 12-246-1235-234-14-145-123456-1-23456-12456
always rasend 1235-1-234-14-145
always lösend 123-246-234-14-145
before s always wende 2456-14-145-15
before s always mode 134-135-145-15
before s always garde 1245-356-145-15
before s always pferde 1234-124-12456-145-15
prfword pferdes 1234-124-12456-145-123456
before s always gebäude 12346-12-34-145-15
prfword gebäudes 12346-12-34-145-123456
endword ees 15-15-234
before s always lee 123-15-15
before s always klee 13-123-15-15
always meesenburg 134-15-15-234-14-12-136-1235-1245
always reesa 1235-15-15-234-1
before s always see 234-15-15
prfword sees 234-15-15-234
prfword gesees 12346-234-15-15-234
before s always tee 2345-15-15
before s always hilfe 125-24-123-124-15
before s always reife 1235-146-124-15
prfword reifes 1235-146-124-123456
before s always schärfe 156-345-1235-124-15
before s always lage 123-1-12346
prfword lages 123-1-1245-123456
before s always säge 5-234-1245-15
before s always präge 1234-1235-345-12346
always tragesack 2345-1245-15-234-1-46
begmidword tragesäck 2345-1245-15-234-345-46
always tragesitz 2345-1245-15-2-24
before s begmidword prestige 1234-1235-15-23456-45-15
prfword prestiges 1234-1235-15-23456-45-123456
before s always rache 1235-56-15
before s always wäsche 2456-345-156-15
before s always weihe 2456-146-125-15
before s always ruhe 1235-136-125-15
before s always regie 1235-15-1245-346
begmidword dankestele 145-13-123456-2345-13456-15
before s always ränke 1235-345-1345-13-15
prfword ränkes 1235-345-1345-13-123456
begmidword stinkesock 23456-35-13-15-234-135-46
before s always stärke 23456-345-1235-13-15
always bubblesort 12-136-12-12-123-15-234-26-2345
before s always ensemble 14-234-12356-12-123-15
prfword ensembles 14-234-12356-12-123-123456
before s always spiele 2-346-15
prfword spieles 2-346-123456
before s always tele 2345-13456-15
prfword teles 2345-13456-123456
before s always kohle 13-135-125-123-15
before s always file 124-24-123-15
prfword files 124-24-123-123456
before s begmidword galle 1245-1-12345-15
before s midword promille 1234-1235-135-134-24-12345-15
before s sufword promille 12345-134-24-12345-15
before s always vanille 1236-235-24-12345-15
before s always emaille 12356-1-24-12345-15
prfword emailles 12356-1-24-12345-123456
always stillesein 23456-24-12345-15-234-1246
before s always schule 156-136-123-15
before s always puzzle 1234-136-1356-1356-123-15
prfword puzzles 1234-136-1356-1356-123-123456
before s always reklame 1235-15-13-123-1-134-15
before s always creme 6-14-1235-12356-15
prfword cremes 6-14-1235-12356-123456
before s always wärme 2456-345-1235-134-15
always ganesh 1245-235-15-234-125
before s always hygiene 125-6-13456-1245-24-14-15
before s always szene 234-1356-14-15
before s always sahne 234-1-125-1345-15
before s always schweine 156-2456-1246-15
prfword schweines 156-2456-1246-123456
before s always online 135-1345-123-35-15
before s always marine 134-356-35-15
prfword marines 134-356-35-123456
before s always routine 1235-135-136-2345-35-15
prfword routines 1235-135-136-2345-35-123456
before s always wonne 2456-135-1345-1345-15
before s always quarantäne 6-12345-136-356-235-2345-345-1345-15
before s always pläne 1234-123-345-1345-15
before s always apnoe 1-1234-1345-135-15
before s always grippe 1245-1235-24-1234-1234-15
before s always hardware 125-356-145-2456-356-15
before s always software 234-135-124-2345-2456-356-15
before s always schmiere 156-134-346-1235-15
prfword schmieres 156-134-346-1235-123456
before s always karriere 13-356-1235-24-12456-15
prfword amperes 1-134-1234-12456-123456
before s begmidword ampere 1-134-1234-12456-15
before s always repertoire 1235-15-1234-12456-2345-135-24-1235-15
prfword repertoires 1235-15-1234-12456-2345-135-24-1235-123456
before s always satire 234-1-2345-24-1235-15
before s begmidword genre 1245-14-1235-15
prfword genres 1245-14-1235-123456
before s always folklore 124-135-123-13-123-26-15
before s always säure 234-34-1235-15
before s always lektüre 123-15-13-2345-1256-1235-15
before s always käse 13-345-234-15
prfword käses 13-345-234-123456
before s always lese 123-123456-15
before s always reise 1235-146-234-15
prfword reises 1235-146-234-123456
before s always speise 234-1234-146-234-15
before s always gänse 1245-345-1345-234-15
before s always diagnose 145-24-1-1245-1345-135-234-15
before s always narkose 1345-356-13-135-234-15
before s always glukose 1245-123-136-13-135-234-15
before s always hirse 125-24-1235-234-15
before s always baisse 12-1-24-2346-15
before s always hausse 125-16-2346-15
before s always masse 134-1-2346-15
before s always muße 134-136-2346-15
before s always gehäuse 12346-125-34-234-15
prfword gehäuses 12346-125-34-234-123456
before s always gemüse 12346-134-1256-234-15
prfword gemüses 12346-134-1256-234-123456
before s always dialyse 145-24-25-6-13456-234-15
before s always rate 1235-1-236
prfword rates 1235-1-2345-123456
before s always städte 23456-345-145-236
before s always kräfte 5-13-124-15
before s always mächte 134-345-1456-236
before s always rendite 1235-14-145-24-236
before s always punkte 1234-2345-15
prfword punktes 1234-2345-123456
before s always kälte 13-345-123-236
before s always argumente 356-1245-136-134-14-236
prfword argumentes 356-1245-136-134-14-2345-123456
endword erntes 12456-1345-2345-123456
before s always ernte 12456-1345-236
before s always warte 2456-356-236
prfword wartes 2456-356-2345-123456
before s always werte 2456-12456-236
prfword wertes 2456-12456-2345-123456
before s always gäste 1245-345-23456-15
before s always watte 2456-1-2345-236
before s always jute 245-136-236
before s always güte 1245-1256-236
before s always reserve 1235-123456-12456-1236-15
before s always gaze 1245-1-1356-15
begmidword pilzesuch 1234-24-123-1356-15-234-136-1456
begmidword sülzesala 234-1256-123-1356-15-234-25-1
before s always bronze 12-1235-135-1345-1356-15
before s always hitze 125-24-2345-1356-15
midendword ession 15-2346-245
always praesens 1234-1235-1-15-234-14-234
begmidword spaceshutt 234-1234-1-6-14-15-234-125-136-2345-2345
sufword desselb 145-123456-234-13456-12
always desensibilisier 145-15-234-14-234-24-12-24-123-24-234-346-1235
always arcadespiel 356-6-14-1-145-15-2-346
always balladesänger 12-1-12345-1-145-15-234-345-1345-1245-12456
always mädesüß 134-345-145-15-234-1256-2346
always redesign 1235-15-145-123456-24-1245-1345
always kleidespiegel 13-123-146-145-15-234-1234-346-1245-13456
begmidword schneidescher 156-1345-146-145-15-156-12456
begmidword scheidestund 156-146-145-15-23456-256-145
begmidword scheidestünd 156-146-145-15-23456-1256-1345-145
always waldes 2456-25-145-123456
always landes 123-235-145-123456
begmidword landesch 123-235-145-15-156
always landeschef 123-235-145-123456-1456-15-124
prfword landest 123-235-145-15-23456
always landesteg 123-235-145-15-23456-15-1245
begmidword landestell 123-235-145-15-2-13456
always standes 2-23456-123456
always standest 2-23456-15-23456
always ständest 5-23456-15-23456
always ständestaat 5-23456-15-23456-2345
always wendest 2456-14-145-15-23456
always kindes 13-35-145-123456
always bundes 12-256-145-123456
always codeschnipsel 6-14-135-145-15-156-1345-24-1234-234-13456
always codestück 6-14-135-145-15-23456-1256-46
always todes 2345-135-145-123456
begmidword freudestrahl 124-1235-126-145-15-23456-1235-1-125-123
prfword freesie 124-1235-15-15-234-24-15
begmidword bungeespr 12-256-1245-15-15-234-1234-1235
begmidword erdeess 12456-145-15-15-2346
always heesters 125-15-15-23456-12456-234
prfword hefesorte 125-15-124-15-234-26-236
always hefesorten 125-15-124-15-234-26-2345-14
prfword hefespore 125-15-124-15-234-1234-26-15
always hefesporen 125-15-124-15-234-1234-26-14
always hefestück 125-15-124-15-23456-1256-46
always rufesatz 1235-136-124-15-234-1356
always rufesätz 1235-136-124-15-5-234-1356
always sieges 234-346-1245-123456
always tages 2345-1-1245-123456
always tageschau 2345-1-12346-156-16
syllable geschädig 12346-156-345-145-45
begmidword sageschreib 234-1245-15-156-12
begmidword legesohl 123-15-12346-234-135-125-123
always hagestolz 125-1-12346-23456-135-123-1356
always wagestück 2456-1-12346-23456-1256-46
always nahestand 1345-1-125-15-2-23456
always cachespeicher 6-14-56-15-234-1234-146-1456-12456
midendword ehesach 2356-15-234-56
sufword ehesach 15-125-15-234-56
midword ehesakramen 2356-15-234-1-13-1235-1-134-14
begword ehesakramen 15-125-15-234-1-13-1235-1-134-14
begword eheschließ 15-125-15-156-2346
midword eheschließ 2356-15-156-2346
sufword ehesegen 15-125-15-234-15-1245-14
midendword ehesegen 2356-15-234-15-1245-14
begword ehesemin 15-125-15-234-12356-35
midword ehesemin 2356-15-234-12356-35
sufword ehestand 15-125-15-2-23456
midendword ehestand 2356-15-2-23456
begword eheständ 15-125-15-5-23456
midendword eheständ 2356-15-5-23456
always leiheschein 123-146-125-15-156-1246
always leiheschuld 123-146-125-15-156-136-123-145
always mathestund 134-1-2345-125-15-23456-256-145
always vlies 1236-123-346-234
always geniestreich 1245-14-346-23456-1235-146-1456
always spezies 234-1234-15-1356-24-123456
always troubleshoot 2345-1235-135-136-12-123-15-234-125-135-135-2345
always mühlespiel 134-1256-125-123-15-2-346
always teileseit 2345-146-123-15-234-146-2345
prfword teileseite 2345-146-123-15-234-146-236
always chilesalpeter 1456-24-123-15-234-25-1234-15-2345-12456
sufword achilles 1-1456-24-12345-123456
midword achilles 56-24-12345-123456
always güllesilo 1245-1256-12345-15-234-24-123-135
always moleskin 134-135-123-15-234-13-35
always solesalz 234-135-123-15-234-25-1356
always herkules 125-12456-13-136-123-123456
always stylesheet 23456-6-13456-123-15-234-125-15-15-2345
